North Carolina, session 2025, HB469.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Part 3 of Article 1 of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes is amended
by adding a new section to read:
"§ 116-40.14. Intrastate athletic competition.
(a) Purpose. – The purpose of this section is to ensure that high-enrollment constituent
institutions of The University of North Carolina regularly compete against one another in eligible
sports.
(b) Definitions. – For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) Eligible sport. – All of the following:
a. Football.
b. Men's basketball.
c. Women's basketball.
d. Baseball.
e. Softball.
(2) High-enrollment institution. – The following constituent institutions of The
University of North Carolina:
a. North Carolina State University at Raleigh.
b. The University of North Carolina at Chapel Hill.
*H469-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) High-game count sport. – All of the following eligible sports:
a. Baseball.
b. Softball.
(4) Home game. – A game held at a site selected by the hosting constituent
institution, including a neutral site.
(5) Low-game count sport. – All of the following eligible sports:
a. Football.
b. Men's basketball.
c. Women's basketball.
(c) Competition Required. – Every academic year for all eligible sports, a
high-enrollment institution shall do all of the following:
(1) For each low-game count sport, play at least one home game or one away
game against another high-enrollment institution.
(2) For each high-game count sport, play a series of at least three home games or
three away games against another high-enrollment institution."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2026-2027 academic year.
Page 2 House Bill 469-First Edition